Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1084.01
Place of origin, defined.

Place of origin shall mean the county and state where nursery stock was most recently grown for a period of not less than one cycle of active growth.

Laws 1993, LB 406, § 10.